Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.14
Hazardous waste; site review committee; issue report; contents.

The committee shall issue a report no later than one hundred eighty days from the date the notice of intent is filed, except that the deadline may be extended by mutual agreement between the applicant and the committee. The report shall document the discussion of community concerns raised during review by the committee of the proposed commercial hazardous waste management facility, including identification and discussion of the issues which were resolved, the issues which were not resolved, and the questions which were not answered, including the reasons they were not answered.

The report may also include recommendations on the compensation which the applicant should pay or provide to the local governing body. Any recommendations shall be subject to further negotiations between the applicant and the local governing body.

Copies of the report shall be made available to committee members, the department, the applicant, and the public.

After issuance of its report, the committee shall have no further duties, except that the department may ask the committee to review any changes related to the proposed commercial hazardous waste management facility which are proposed by the applicant and to amend its report if appropriate.

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 8.